District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1102.05

Registration statement of candidate; depository information.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 452, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 205
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(p), (r), 29 DCR 458
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 124(a), 47 DCR 520
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1415.
1973 Ed., § 1-1135.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).